District of Columbia statutes.
31-2307

Regulations.

The Commissioner may, in accordance with § 2-505, promulgate rules, regulations, and orders as are necessary or appropriate to carry out the provisions of this chapter. The Council may approve or disapprove any rules, regulations, or orders promulgated by the Commissioner within 30 days after the date transmitted to the Council. If no action is taken by the Council, the rules, regulations, or orders shall be deemed to be approved.

Oct. 21, 2000, D.C. Law 13-194, § 8, 47 DCR 7427